Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Proceedings in Aid of Execution

Appointment of receiver. —

Under this article, relative to proceedings in aid of execution, and authorizing appointment of a receiver in such proceedings, mortgagees and lien creditors of a partnership, who were not parties to action against firm resulting in judgment, in aid of execution under which a receiver of the firm property was appointed, cannot, on intervention, complain of the appointment. First Nat'l Bank v. Cook, 12 Wyo. 492, 76 P. 674,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 12 Wyo. 492, 78 P. 1083,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1904).

Improper appointment. —

In proceedings in aid of execution, appointment of receiver to examine claims of lien creditors and mortgagees to the property, and make recommendations to court, is improper, as it is a summary proceeding, and disputes between debtor and third persons cannot be settled. First Nat'l Bank v. Cook, 12 Wyo. 492, 76 P. 674,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 12 Wyo. 492, 78 P. 1083,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1904).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

30 Am. Jur. 2d Executions and Enforcement of Judgments §§ 643 to 763; 31 Am. Jur. 2d Exemptions §§ 35 to 62.

33 C.J.S. Executions §§ 345 to 406.

§ 1-17-401.
Action against equitable assets.

Any equitable interests
the judgment debtor has as mortgagor, mortgagee or otherwise, or any
interest he has in any joint stock company, money contract, claim
or chose in action due or to become due to him, or in any judgment
or order, or any money, goods or effects which he has in the possession
of any person, which has not been levied upon and sold under execution
is subject to the payment of the judgment by action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 464; R.S. 1887, § 2812; R.S. 1899, § 3932; C.S. 1910, § 4786; C.S. 1920, § 6056; R.S. 1931, § 89-3101; C.S. 1945, § 3-4701; W.S. 1957, § 1-410; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-401; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to sale of corporate stock under execution or attachment, see chapter 19 of this title.

As to when proceeds of wrongful death judgment may not be used to pay debts of decedent, see §

1-38-102

.

As to exemption from attachment or garnishment of interest in prepaid or prearranged funeral contracts, see §

26-32-102

.

As to levies on bulk transfers, see § 34.1-9-301.

As to attachment of goods covered by negotiable instruments, see § 34.1-7-602.

As to creditor's legal process, see § 34.1-8-112.

Bare legal title not attachable. —

Where, under a loan participation agreement, the lead institution at no time held more than bare legal title under the note and mortgage, and it acted in that regard in the position of a fiduciary with respect to the savings and loan institution participants since the lead institution held no equitable interest in the note and mortgage, there is nothing for plaintiff to attach, and her action as judgment creditor of the lead institution seeking assignment of a property interest on the mortgage must fail. McVay v. Western Plains Service Corp., 823 F.2d 1395, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 17760 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1987).

Assignment of defendants'
chose in action to plaintiff held
improper. —

Unpublished decision:

After entering judgment for plaintiff, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-17-401

, the district court assigned to plaintiff defendants'
interest in a lawsuit they had filed in Florida; this was an abuse of discretion due to the extraordinary difficulty in estimating the value of a chose in action, and the fact that plaintiff had no intention of actually litigating the suit. The court could have subjected the chose to an execution sale, imposed an equitable lien on any proceeds from the suit, or selected an alternative remedy; but simply granting plaintiff direct ownership of defendants'
chose was impermissible.
Amphibious Partners LLC v. Redman, 389 Fed. Appx. 762,

2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 15234

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2010).

Creditor is not obliged to pursue summary proceedings,

but may resort in the first instance to an action in the nature of a creditors' bill. Schloredt v. Boyden, 9 Wyo. 392, 64 P. 225,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1901).

Counterclaims. —

Under statute providing that when cross-demands have existed between two persons, so that if one had brought action the other could have set up counterclaim, neither can be deprived of benefit thereof through assignment by, or death of, the other, but the two demands must be deemed compensated so far as they equal each other, and counterclaim may be set up even if not presented to executor or administrator under §

2-6-209

.Dallas Dome Wyoming Oil Fields Co. v. Brooder, 55 Wyo. 109, 97 P.2d 311,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1939).

Applied

in

James S. Jackson Co. v. Meyer, 677 P.2d 835,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability insurance carried by a charity as subject to appropriation and satisfaction of judgment in tort, 25 ALR2d 29.

Surplus income of trust, and excess of amount required for support and education of beneficiary, as subject of supplementary proceedings, 36 ALR2d 1215.

Rights of creditors of life insured as to options or other benefits available to him during his lifetime, 37 ALR2d 268.

§ 1-17-402.
Discovery in aid of execution.

At any time after entry of judgment, the judgment creditor may obtain discovery by interrogatories, depositions or otherwise, from any person, including the judgment debtor, in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

A person served with notice of discovery under this section shall hold for the benefit of the judgment creditor from the time of service all property, money and credits in his hands belonging to the judgment debtor or due to him.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 472; R.S. 1887, § 2820; R.S. 1899, § 3940; C.S. 1910, § 4799; C.S. 1920, § 6069; R.S. 1931, § 89-3114; C.S. 1945, § 3-4702; W.S. 1957, § 1-411; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-402; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to deposition and discovery, see Rules 26 through 37, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

All of the following case annotations are taken from cases decided under former §§

1-17-403

and 1-17-404.

Only judge can order debtor's appearance. —

No person except a judge is authorized to issue an order requiring the debtor to appear and answer concerning his property. Poljanec v. Freed Fin. Co., 440 P.2d 251,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1968).

In county of residence or where found. —

No authority by statute or rule authorizes a district judge to issue an order for the debtor to appear and answer in a county other than the county of his residence or county in which he is found. Poljanec v. Freed Fin. Co., 440 P.2d 251,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1968).

Matters deemed foreign to proceeding. —

Statutory proceeding in aid of execution provides summary method of discovering property subject to execution and applying it thereto when discovered, but taking over of defendant's business, marshaling of liens and settlement of disputed titles are foreign to proceeding. First Nat'l Bank v. Cook, 12 Wyo. 492, 76 P. 674,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 12 Wyo. 492, 78 P. 1083,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1904).

Debtor must be about to leave state or conceal himself. —

This section authorizes a warrant for arrest, but such action is limited to cases where the judgment debtor is about to leave the state or conceal himself. Poljanec v. Freed Fin. Co., 440 P.2d 251,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1968).

Service. —

An order for arrest of defendant in a civil action can only be served in the county where issued. Ahlrep v. Hughes, 18 Wyo. 51, 102 P. 659,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1909).

Cited

in

Schloredt v. Boyden, 9 Wyo. 392, 64 P. 225,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1901).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

For article, “Collecting Debt in Wyoming: The Fair Debt Collection Practices Act as a Trap for the Unwary,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 731 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of provision of Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act relating to validation of debts (15 U.S.C.A. § 1692g),
150 ALR Fed 101.

§§ 1-17-403 and 1-17-404.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to discovery in aid of execution, see §

1-17-402

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 472 and 473, related to the order for examination of a debtor after execution is returned unsatisfied, and the examination of the debtor before the return of execution and subsequent proceedings, respectively.

§ 1-17-405.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987,
ch. 198, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to interrogatories to garnishee, see §

1-15-407

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 475, related to an order for examination of persons indebted to the judgment debtor.

§§ 1-17-406 through 1-17-409.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to discovery in aid of execution, see §

1-17-402

.

As to self-incrimination generally, see art. 1, § 11, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 476, 477, 480 and 481, related to excuses for not answering questions during examinations, references to a master, examination before a master, and a disobedience of orders, respectively.

§ 1-17-410.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987,
ch. 198, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 482, related to payment to the sheriff by the judgment debtor's debtor.

§ 1-17-411.
Order for satisfaction of judgment; request for a hearing.

Following an examination
as provided by W.S.

1-17-402

through

1-17-418

, the court may order any property of the judgment debtor
not exempt by law, to be applied toward the satisfaction of a judgment.
Upon seizure of his property, a judgment debtor may request a hearing
pursuant to W.S.

1-17-102

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 483; R.S. 1887, § 2831; Laws 1897, ch. 11, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3951; Laws 1903, ch. 31, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4810; C.S. 1920, § 6080; R.S. 1931, § 89-3125; C.S. 1945, § 3-4713; W.S. 1957, § 1-422; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-411; Laws 1985, ch. 194, § 2; 1986, ch. 62, § 1; 1987, ch. 198, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to attachment and garnishment generally, see chapter 15 of this title.

As to property exempt from execution or attachment generally, see chapter 20 of this title.

For provision that earnings of inmates on work release program are not subject to garnishment, see §

7-16-308

.

As to exemption of fire department pension and retirement benefits, see §

15-5-209

.

As to exemption of payments for performance of military duty, see §

19-9-401

.

As to exemption of worker's compensation awards, see §

27-14-702

.

For provision that there shall be no garnishment before judgment in consumer credit cases, see §

40-14-504

.

As to limitation on garnishment in consumer credit cases, see §

40-14-505

.

For provision that there shall be no discharge from employment for garnishment in consumer credit cases, see §

40-14-506

.

Discharge of garnishee where amount due exempt. —

Plaintiff garnished defendant's employer and defendant filed affidavit claiming that amount due him was exempt, whereupon garnishee was discharged, but within month plaintiff again had defendant's employer summoned as garnishee and court again found that amount due was exempt and ordered the garnishee discharged, it being held that such order was proper, though defendant had not filed second affidavit. Lafferty v. Sistalla, 11 Wyo. 360, 72 P. 192,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1903).

Matters deemed foreign to proceeding. —

Statutory proceeding in aid of execution provides summary method of discovering property subject to execution and applying it thereto when discovered, but taking over of defendant's business, marshaling of liens and settlement of disputed titles are foreign to proceeding. First Nat'l Bank v. Cook, 12 Wyo. 492, 76 P. 674,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 12 Wyo. 492, 78 P. 1083,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1904).

Quoted

in

James S. Jackson Co. v. Meyer, 677 P.2d 835,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Schloredt v. Boyden, 9 Wyo. 392, 64 P. 225,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1901); Lingle State Bank v. Podolak, 740 P.2d 392,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 480

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

See note, “Wage Exemption in Wyoming,” 11 Wyo. L.J. 125.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-412.
Appointment of receiver; control of property.

The court may appoint
the sheriff of the proper county or other suitable person as receiver
of the property of the judgment debtor, and may forbid a transfer
or other disposition of or interference with the property of the judgment
debtor, not exempt by law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 484; R.S. 1887, § 2832; R.S. 1899, § 3952; C.S. 1910, § 4811; C.S. 1920, § 6081; R.S. 1931, § 89-3126; C.S. 1945, § 3-4714; W.S. 1957, § 1-423; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-412.

Cross references. —

As to property exempt from execution or attachment generally, see chapter 20 of this title.

As to receivers generally, see chapter 33 of this title.

Judgment creditor may have receiver appointed. —

Judgment creditor may, under certain circumstances, have receiver appointed to take charge of property of judgment debtor for purpose of enabling him to enforce judgment. State ex rel. Avenius v. Tidball, 35 Wyo. 496, 252 P. 499,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1927).

Over debtor corporation. —

Judgment creditor may have receiver appointed over debtor corporation, though it is akin to insolvency proceeding and though it results in dissolution of the corporation. State ex rel. Avenius v. Tidball, 35 Wyo. 496, 252 P. 499,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1927).

Cited

in

Schloredt v. Boyden, 9 Wyo. 392, 64 P. 225,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1901).

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-413.
Appointment of sheriff or another as receiver.

If the sheriff is appointed
receiver, he and his sureties are liable on his official bond as receiver.
If another person is appointed, he shall take an oath and bond as
in other cases.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 485; R.S. 1887, § 2833; R.S. 1899, § 3953; C.S. 1910, § 4812; C.S. 1920, § 6082; R.S. 1931, § 89-3127; C.S. 1945, § 3-4715; W.S. 1957, § 1-424; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-413.

Cross references. —

As to oath and bond of receiver, see §

1-33-103

.

Matters deemed foreign to proceeding. —

Statutory proceeding in aid of execution provides summary method of discovering property subject to execution and applying it thereto when discovered, but taking over of defendant's business, marshaling of liens and settlement of disputed titles are foreign to proceeding. First Nat'l Bank v. Cook, 12 Wyo. 492, 76 P. 674,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 12 Wyo. 492, 78 P. 1083,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1904).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-414.
Sale of judgment debtor's equitable or other interest in realty.

If it appears that the
judgment debtor has an interest in real estate in the county in which
proceedings are had, as mortgagor, mortgagee or otherwise, and his
interest can be ascertained as between himself and any person holding
the legal estate or having a lien or interest therein, without controversy,
the receiver may be ordered to sell and convey the real estate, or
the interest of the debtor. The sale shall be conducted as provided
for the sale of real estate upon execution, and before execution of
the deed, the proceedings of sale shall be approved by the court in
which the judgment was rendered or the transcript filed.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 486; R.S. 1887, § 2834; R.S. 1899, § 3954; C.S. 1910, § 4813; C.S. 1920, § 6083; R.S. 1931, § 89-3128; C.S. 1945, § 3-4716; W.S. 1957, § 1-425; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-414.

Cross references. —

As to sale of real estate upon execution, see §§

1-17-316

,

1-17-321

to

1-17-332

and chapter 18 of this title.

Receiver may be appointed in mortgage foreclosure

without showing person liable for indebtedness was insolvent. Grieve v. Huber, 38 Wyo. 223, 266 P. 128,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 41 Wyo. 168, 283 P. 1105,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1930).

Entry of judgment in foreclosure action did not defeat right to appoint receiver

as respected defendants subsequently served with process. Grieve v. Huber, 38 Wyo. 223, 266 P. 128,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 41 Wyo. 168, 283 P. 1105,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1930).

Appointment of receiver during period of redemption

in foreclosure was not invasion of mortgagor's constitutional rights. Grieve v. Huber, 38 Wyo. 223, 266 P. 128,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 41 Wyo. 168, 283 P. 1105,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1930).

Stated

in

Ruby Drilling Co. v. Title Guar. Co., 750 P.2d 674,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Avenius v. Tidball, 35 Wyo. 496, 252 P. 499,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(1927).

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-415.
Filing
of orders.

All orders of the court
issued pursuant to this article shall be filed with the clerk of the
district court of the county in which the judgment is rendered. The
clerk shall enter on the execution docket the time of filing the judgment
or transcript.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 487; R.S. 1887, § 2836; R.S. 1899, § 3955; C.S. 1910, § 4814; C.S. 1920, § 6084; R.S. 1931, § 89-3129; C.S. 1945, § 3-4717; W.S. 1957, § 1-426; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-415; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 2; 1988, ch. 37, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to service of summons, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “or in which the transcript of the justice court proceeding is filed” following “which the judgment is rendered.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-416.
Costs.

The judge shall allow
to clerks, sheriffs, referees, receivers and witnesses compensation
allowed for like services in other cases, to be taxed as costs and
shall enforce the collection thereof from the party or parties liable
for payment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 489; R.S. 1887, § 2837; R.S. 1899, § 3956; C.S. 1910, § 4815; C.S. 1920, § 6085; R.S. 1931, § 89-3130; C.S. 1945, § 3-4718; W.S. 1957, § 1-427; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-416.

Cross references. —

As to fees and costs generally, see chapter 14 of this title.

§ 1-17-417.
Lien on debtor vendee's interest in personalty; interest defined.

An attaching or judgment
creditor of a vendee in a sale, contract or lease wherein the transfer
of title or ownership of personal property is contingent upon any
condition, has a lien upon the personal property to the extent of
the interest of the vendee therein. For the purposes of W.S.

1-17-417

and

1-17-418

, the interest of the vendee is the amount which the personal
property will bring at any judicial sale, over and above any sums
then unpaid to the vendor in the sale, contract or lease.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 63, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 3-4719; W.S. 1957, § 1-428; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-417.

Law reviews. —

See “Creditors' Rights Under the Recording Statutes,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 73.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Vendee's interest under executory contract as subject to execution, 1 ALR2d 727.

§ 1-17-418.
Lien on debtor vendee's interest in personalty; manner and effect
of sale.

When any personal property
is attached or levied upon under execution, the judgment creditor
shall pay the amount then due the vendor or the assignee of vendor
under the sale, contract or lease, and proceed to sell the personal
property the same as if title and ownership were in the vendee. If
the judgment creditor elects to pay the vendor or assignee of vendor,
the bill of sale of the sheriff or person selling under execution
shall convey to the purchaser at the execution sale all of the right,
title and interest of the vendor to the personal property.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 63, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 3-4720; W.S. 1957, § 1-429; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-418.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 3, ch. 63, Laws 1937, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).